California statutes. Water Code
 available funds. No state funds shall be appropriated until federal construction funds are available, and no state funds shall be appropriated for any portion or unit of the project until the responsible local agency has provided assurances of financial capability to complete the recreational acquisition and development program for that portion or unit, as detailed in the project report.

The Legislature affirms the topographical and hydrologic characteristics of the Merced County Stream Group for which provision for participation in reservoirs has been made in Section 12826 and determines that the Merced County Streams Project is a project of the Merced County Stream Group, as defined and excepted in Section 12826. The Reclamation Board may loan the local agency the funds necessary to pay the local portion of the costs of the lands, easements, and rights-of-way. The rate of interest on the loan shall be the current rate for the Pooled Money Investment Account. All
 other provisions of Section 12585.4 shall be applicable to a loan to the local agency under this section.

Any money previously appropriated to the department for the Merced Stream Channel Improvement shall be available for the purposes of this section, including that reappropriated from the Special Account for Capital Outlay in Item 3860-490-036(2) of the Budget Act of 1986 (Chapter 186 of the Statutes of 1986).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

12668.

(a) The project for flood control on the San Joaquin River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with P.L. 98-63, at a federal cost of approximately eight million dollars ($8,000,000), for the accomplishment of selective clearing and snagging work in the San Joaquin Channel, from Friant Dam to the Stockton Deep Water Channel, and in that area of the North Fork of the Kings River and Mendota Pool from the southerly boundary of the James Reclamation District No. 1606 to Mendota Dam. Because of the unique situation presented by this project, the department shall maintain and operate, on behalf of the state, the work
 performed by the Corps of Engineers on this project, and the cost of that maintenance and operation shall be borne by the state.

(b) Any assurance agreement entered into between the Secretary of the Army and the Reclamation Board for this project shall provide for mitigation of the impact of the project with the objective of providing a net long-term enhancement of the riparian habitat and fishery in the project area.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, in reviewing future projects, to improve the capacity of the San Joaquin River to provide for mitigation of the impact of the project and net long-term enhancement of the riparian habitats and fisheries in the project area.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the local responsibility of maintenance of this and future federal projects in and along the San
 Joaquin River may be better, more efficiently, and more fairly fulfilled by geographically larger, or regional, local public entities. The Legislature, therefore, directs the Reclamation Board, in coordination with the department, to study the possibility of creating, by a joint powers agreement or by special act of the Legislature, one or more regional districts to undertake at a future time local maintenance responsibility for this project. The Reclamation Board shall report its findings to the Legislature not later than December 31, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1488, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12669.

The plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on the Fresno County Stream Group identified as the Redbank-Fancher Creeks Flood Control Project, including the Redbank Creek Detention Basin, is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 98-147, at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon recommendation and advice of the department or Reclamation Board, except that no nonflood control application of water may occur within the Redbank Creek Detention Basin
 except for landscape irrigation or dust control. The preconstruction environmental assessment by the United States Army Corp of Engineers shall include the conduct of field permeability tests and consideration of the recommendations set forth in the “Evaluation Of Impacts On The THAN Site By The Proposed Redbank Creek Flood Detention Basin,” 1988, of the State Department of Health Services, Toxic Substances Control Division. Basin design criteria and operational procedures shall include, but not be limited to, the detailed post excavation soils mapping, installation and monitoring of observation wells, and creation of a contingency fund, as indicated by the environmental assessment and as required for compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). If state bond act moneys are available for flood control purposes, the Legislature may appropriate those moneys for this project. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer
 preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in the appropriation of available funds. Funds shall be appropriated pursuant to this authorization only upon the act of Congress adopting and authorizing the project as substantially described in House Document Numbered 98-147. The Legislature affirms the topographical and hydrological characteristics of the Fresno County Stream Group for which provision for participation in reservoirs has been made in Section 12868 and determines that the Redbank-Fancher Creeks Flood Control Project is a project on the Fresno County Stream Group, as defined and excepted in Section 12826. The department or Reclamation Board may loan the local agency the funds necessary to pay the local portion of the costs of the lands, easements, and rights-of-way, less the credit provided by Section 12585.3. The rate of interest on the loan shall be the current rate for the Pooled Money Investment Account. The department or Reclamation Board may pay 50 percent of the
 nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1211, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12669.1.

The Fresno Metropolitan Flood Control District may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by House Document Numbered 98-147 will be furnished in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12669.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

12669.2.

The Fresno Metropolitan Flood Control District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12669 and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1229, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.

The Cache Creek Settling Basin Unit of the plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on Cache Creek is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, in the report dated April 27, 1981, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved November 17, 1986 (Public Law 99-662), at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state participation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other
 statewide programs in appropriation of available funds. Notwithstanding Section 12585.5, the state shall pay all of the nonfederal costs required by Public Law 99-662. Notwithstanding Sections 12642 and 12828, the state shall maintain and operate the unit and, through the Reclamation Board, shall hold the United States harmless from damages due to the construction of the works. Notwithstanding Section 12847, the state may pay all of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 935, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.2.

(a) The project for flood protection on the Sacramento River for the City of West Sacramento is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, in the report “Sacramento Metro Area, California” dated June 29, 1992, and as adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved October 31, 1992 (Public Law 102-580), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department or the
 Reclamation Board.

(b) The department or the Reclamation Board may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1107, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.3.

The City of West Sacramento, or a joint power authority formed by the City of West Sacramento and Reclamation Districts 537 and 900, may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the Water Resources Development Act of 1992 (Public Law 102-580) will be furnished in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12670.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1107, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.4.

The City of West Sacramento, or joint power authority formed by the City of West Sacramento and Reclamation Districts 537 and 900, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, carry out the plans and project referred to in Section 12670.2 and may make modification and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1107, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.5.

The West Sacramento Project for flood risk reduction along the Yolo Bypass, Sacramento Bypass, and Sacramento River adopted and authorized by the United States Congress in the Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation Act (Public Law 114-322), is hereby adopted and approved substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers in the Report entitled “West Sacramento Project General Reevaluation Report” and dated December 2015, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department or the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 708, Sec. 6.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.7.

(a) The project for flood protection along the Feather River and Yuba River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, in the report entitled “Yuba River Basin Investigation, California Feasibility Report.”

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 12585.5, the nonfederal engineering costs and the nonfederal design costs required by Section 2215 (b) and (c) of Title
 33 of the United States Code, with regard to the project described in subdivision (a), are eligible for reimbursement by the state before federal and state authorization and before the appropriation of construction funds by Congress.

(c) Funds shall be appropriated for the project in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.8.

(a) The project for flood protection measures on the Upper Guadalupe River in Santa Clara County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers in a report dated August 19, 1998, or as that report may be subsequently modified, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state cooperation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department. The department may pay 50 percent of the
 nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(b) The Santa Clara Valley Water District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that local cooperation required by the final report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The Santa Clara Valley Water District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.10.

The project for flood protection along the American River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, in the report entitled “American River Watershed, California” dated June 27, 1996, and as adopted and authorized by Congress on October 12, 1996, in Section 101 of the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-303), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department or the
 Reclamation Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.11.

(a) (1) The project for flood damage reduction and environmental restoration in the American River watershed in Sacramento County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with Congressional approval and the final report of the Chief of Engineers dated November 5, 2002, as authorized by Section 128 of the Energy and Water Development Appropriations Act, 2004 (P.L. 108-137), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by statute, upon the recommendation and
 advice of the department or the Reclamation Board.

(2) The project includes the construction of a new bridge with an estimated cost of sixty-six million dollars ($66,000,000), of which thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000) is allocated to flood damage reduction and dam safety.

(3) The state’s share of the bridge project cost shall be at least five million, two hundred thousand dollars ($5,200,000), but not more than nine million dollars ($9,000,000), of the project amount that is allocated to flood damage reduction.

(4) The calculation of the state’s share of the funding pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be determined by the federal government’s allocation of the costs of the bridge to the dam safety features of the project.

(b) The Sacramento Area
 Flood Control Agency shall enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the agency agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(c) The City of Folsom shall serve as the nonfederal sponsor of the bridge authorized as part of the project and shall enter into an agreement with the department to receive the state’s proportionate share of the cost of the bridge and to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.12.

With regard to the project for flood control authorized in Section 12670.10, the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency may join the department or the Reclamation Board in providing the Secretary of the Army with the assurances of nonfederal cooperation required by the Water Resources Development Act of 1996, and may, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, carry out the project with the modifications and amendments that may be necessary to fulfill the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter. The Sacramento Area Flood Control
 Agency shall be reimbursed pursuant to Section 12585.5 for any project costs that the agency advances on behalf of the department or the Reclamation Board, provided that prior to any such reimbursement, the agency shall execute an agreement with the department under which it agrees to indemnify and hold the state harmless from damages due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project and agrees to operate, maintain, repair, replace, and rehabilitate the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.14.

The following projects in areas within the City of Sacramento and the Counties of Sacramento and Sutter are adopted and authorized at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation upon the recommendation and advice of the department or the Central Valley Flood Protection Board:

(a) The project for flood control in the Natomas and North Sacramento areas adopted and authorized by Congress in Section 9159 of the Department of Defense Appropriations Act of 1993 (Public Law 102-396) substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in the report entitled “American River Watershed Investigation” dated July 1, 1992.

(b) The project for
 flood control along the American and Sacramento Rivers adopted and authorized by Congress in Section 101(a)(1) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-303) substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in the report entitled “American River Watershed Project, California” dated June 27, 1996, as modified by Congress in Section 366 of the Water Resources Development Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-53), as further modified to include the project features necessary to provide a 200-year level of flood protection along the American and Sacramento Rivers and within the Natomas Basin as described in the Final Engineer’s Report dated April 19, 2007, adopted by the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency, as further modified by the 2010 final feasibility study for the American River Watershed, Common Features Project, Natomas Basin, adopted by Congress in Section 7002 of the Water
 Resources Reform and Development Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-121), and as modified by the American River Watershed Common Features General Reevaluation Report adopted by Congress in Section 1401 of the Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation Act of 2016 (Public Law 114-322).

(c) The project to modify Folsom Dam adopted and authorized by Congress in Section 101(a)(6) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-53), as described in the United States Army Corps of Engineers Supplemental Information Report for the American River Watershed Project, California, dated March 1996, as modified by the report entitled “Folsom Dam Modification Report, New Outlets Plan,” dated March 1998, prepared by the Sacramento Area Flood
 Control Agency, and as further modified by the Post-Authorization Change Report, American River Watershed Project (Folsom Dam Modification and Folsom Dam Raise Projects), dated March 2007, adopted by Congress in Section 3029 of the Water Resources Development Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-114).

(d) (1) The project for flood control, environmental restoration, and recreation along south Sacramento County streams adopted and authorized by Congress in Section 101(a)(8) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-53) as described in the report of the Chief of Engineers entitled “South Sacramento County Streams, California” dated October 6, 1998.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 12657, at the discretion of the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency may provide, for the project described in paragraph (1), the
 assurances of local cooperation satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army, in accordance with Section 12657, in lieu of assurances by the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 309, Sec. 2.   (SB 580)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency’s share of the nonfederal capital costs of the projects for flood control authorized in Section 12670.14 shall be calculated in accordance with Section 12585.5, and the agency shall be reimbursed pursuant to Section 12585.5 for any costs of project features that the agency advances on behalf of the department or Reclamation Board if either of the following requirements is met:

(1) The
 advances are made in response to a federal request for payment of the nonfederal share of the cost of the project.

(2) If the advances are made for project features that have not yet been authorized by Congress, the Reclamation Board has received a written determination by the federal government that the project features will likely be authorized by Congress and, if so authorized, the advances will be eligible for credit toward the nonfederal share of the cost of these features.

(b) Prior to any reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (a), the agency shall execute an agreement with the department under which it agrees to indemnify and hold the state harmless from damages due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of those projects and agrees to operate, maintain, repair, replace, and rehabilitate those projects, or provide the agreement of its appropriate member agency to do
 so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.20.

(a) The projects for flood protection and integrated resource management in the Colusa Basin are adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the “Colusa Basin Water Management Program” dated February 1995 and its final environmental documentation, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department or the Reclamation Board.

(b) The state, any local
 public agency, or other entity may cooperate with any federal agency with regard to the planning, design, environmental compliance, financing, and construction of projects authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) No state funds shall be expended for the projects described in subdivision (a) unless both of the following requirements are met:

(1) Required environmental documentation has been completed.

(2) The Reclamation Board has approved the Colusa Basin Water Management Program and the projects described in subdivision (a).

(d) Except as specified in subdivision (c), for projects authorized in subdivision (a), the state shall pay both of the following:

(1) That portion of nonfederal capital
 costs attributable to flood control required by Section 12585.5, or that may be required by amendment to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570).

(2) That portion of nonfederal costs for fish, wildlife, and recreational enhancement features established by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12840).

(e) If required by the Secretary of the Interior, the Reclamation Board may give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Interior that the local cooperation authorized in subdivision (b) will be furnished by the state in connection with the flood control and fish, wildlife, and recreational enhancement features of the projects described in subdivision (a). Assurances provided pursuant to this subdivision may not be made until the local agency, by binding agreement with the Reclamation Board, has agreed to assume all obligations under Sections 12585 to 12585.5, inclusive, and
 Section 12642, or that may be required by amendment to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570).

(f) The Colusa Basin Drainage District, or other appropriate local agency, shall establish and maintain a coordinated land use planning and decisionmaking process within the watershed to avoid unmitigated hydraulic impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.22.

(a) The state may provide funds for the Middle Creek Flood Damage Reduction and Ecosystem Restoration Project in Lake County substantially in accordance with the Flood Damage Reduction and Environmental Restoration, Middle Creek, Lake County, California: Report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated November 29, 2004, and as authorized by Section 1001 (11) of the federal Water Resources Development Act of 2007 (Public Law
 110-114), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, including payment for any fish and wildlife enhancement features as provided in Section 12847.

(b) Lake County Watershed Protection District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by state or federal law will be furnished by the district in connection with the project.

(c) Lake County Watershed Protection District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be required by state or federal law.

(d) Lake County Watershed Protection District shall enter into
 an agreement with the department pursuant to which the district agrees to indemnify and hold harmless and save the state, and its officers, agents, and employees, from any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(e) The authorization granted by this section does not affect any eligibility of Lake County Watershed Protection District to receive state funding made available pursuant to provisions of law other than this part if the receipt of those funds does not result in overpayment for any feature of the project.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that the project described in subdivision (a) modifies and replaces portions of the project described in Section 12656.5. The project described in subdivision (a) shall constitute a part of the State Plan of Flood
 Control and the portion of the project described in Section 12656.5 that is replaced by the project described in subdivision (a) shall not constitute a part of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   (AB 74)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12670.23.

(a) The state may provide funds for the Hamilton City Flood Damage Reduction and Ecosystem Restoration Project in Glenn County substantially in accordance with the Hamilton City Flood Damage Reduction and Ecosystem Restoration, Glenn County, California: Report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated December 22, 2004, and authorized by Section 1001 (8) of the federal Water Resources Development Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-114),
 at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, including payment for any fish and wildlife enhancement features as provided in Section 12847.

(b) Reclamation District No. 2140 shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by state or federal law will be furnished by the district in connection with the project.

(c) Reclamation District No. 2140, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be required by federal or state law.

(d) Reclamation District No. 2140 shall enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to
 which the district agrees to indemnify and hold harmless and save the state, and its officers, agents, and employees, from any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(e) The authorization granted by this section does not affect any eligibility of Reclamation District No. 2140 to receive state funding made available pursuant to provisions of law other than this part if the receipt of those state funds does not result in overpayment for any feature of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 216, Sec. 2.   (AB 74)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Projects in Other Watersheds [12671. - 12749.99.]

12671.

The projects on the Ventura River and tributaries for flood protection at Ventura and Ojai, California, are adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 323, Seventy-seventh Congress, First Session, at an estimated cost to the State of one hundred thirty-nine thousand dollars ($139,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12672.

The Ventura County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of War that the local cooperation, required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the Ventura County Flood Control District in connection with the flood control project adopted and authorized in Section 12671.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12673.

The project for construction of flood control protection along the Santa Clara River, and its tributaries, is approved and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 443, Eightieth Congress, First Session, and authorized by act of Congress approved June 30, 1948, Public Law 858, Eightieth Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon approval of the general plan of improvement by, and the recommendation of, the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12674.

The Ventura County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that local cooperation, required by Section 201 of the act of Congress approved June 30, 1948 (Public, Numbered 858, Eightieth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the Ventura County Flood Control District in connection with the flood control project adopted and authorized in Section 12673.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12675.

The Ventura County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Sections 12671 and 12673 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Ventura County Flood Control Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12676.

The projects for the Santa Ana River Basin for the protection of Orange County, including the projects on Lytle and Cajon Creeks for flood protection at San Bernardino and Colton approved in the act of Congress approved June 22, 1936, as modified by the act of Congress approved June 28, 1938, are adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations contained in the report of the Chief of Engineers dated February 11, 1944, at an estimated cost to the State of six hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars ($678,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12677.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of War that the local cooperation, required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the San Bernardino County Flood Control District in connection with the flood control project adopted and authorized in Section 12676.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12676 and exercise all powers granted to it in the San Bernardino County Flood Control Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.1.

The project for flood control on the Santa Ana River Mainstem, including Santiago Creek and Oak Street Drain, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers Conference Report No. 99-1013 99th Congress, as adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved October 17, 1986 (Public Law 99-662, the Water Resources Development Act of 1986), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1285, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.2.

The Orange County Flood Control District, the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, and the San Bernardino County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-662) will be furnished by the districts in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12678.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1285, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.3.

The Orange County Flood Control District, the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, and the San Bernardino County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12678.1, may exercise all powers granted to them in the Orange County Flood Control Act (Chapter 723 of the Statutes of 1927), the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act (Chapter 1122 of the Statutes of 1945), and the San Bernardino County Flood Control Act (Chapter 73 of the Statutes of 1939), respectively, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans
 as may be necessary to execute them for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1285, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12679.

The plan of improvement for flood control in the Santa Ana River Basin is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 135, Eighty-first Congress, First Session, and authorized by act of Congress approved May 17, 1950, Public Law 516, Eighty-first Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon approval of the general plan of improvement by, and the recommendation of, the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12680.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District and the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Section 201 of the act of Congress approved May 17, 1950, Public Law 516, Eighty-first Congress, Second Session, will be furnished by the districts in connection with the plan of improvement for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12679.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12681.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District and the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plan of improvement for flood control referred to in Section 12679 and exercise all powers granted by law to the districts, and the districts may make such modifications and amendments to the plan as may be necessary to execute it for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12681.1.

The plan of improvement for flood control on Lytle and Warm Creeks, San Bernardino County, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 53, Eighty-Ninth Congress, as authorized by act of Congress approved October 27, 1965, Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1965,” at a cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriation of
 available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1577.)
-------------------------------------------

12681.2.
